Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 2 Old-Age Assistance

Cross references.

Ombudsman program for elderly persons residing in long-term care facilities, § 31-8-50 et seq.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of elderly persons residing in long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

49-4-30.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Old-Age Assistance Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 20; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49.

49-4-31.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Applicant” means a person who has applied for assistance under this article.

“Assistance” means money payments to, medical care in behalf of, or any type of remedial care recognized under state law in behalf of needy individuals who are 65 years of age or older but shall not include any such payments to or care in behalf of any individual who is a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental health or developmental disability services.

“Medical institution” means an institution that is organized to provide medical, nursing, or convalescent care.

“Public institution” means an institution that is the responsibility of a governmental unit or over which a governmental unit exercises administrative control.

“Recipient” means a person who has received assistance under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 368, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 683, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-3/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in paragraph (2), substituted “shall not include” for “does not include” near the middle, deleted “an inmate of a public institution (except as a patient in a medical institution) or any individual who is” following “individual who is” in the middle; added paragraphs (3) and (4); and redesignated former paragraph (3) as present paragraph (5).

49-4-32.
Eligibility for assistance under this article.

Assistance shall be granted under this article to any person who:

Is 65 years of age or older;

Does not have sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health;

Has not made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of attaining eligibility for assistance under this article at any time within two years immediately prior to the filing of application for assistance pursuant to this article;

Has been a bona fide resident of this state for not less than one year; and

Is not receiving assistance under Article 3 of this chapter.

No applicant shall be required to subscribe to a pauper’s oath in order to be eligible for assistance under this article.

Inmates of any public institution meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section may be granted assistance, provided such public institution has entered into an agreement with the Department of Community Health to determine an inmate’s eligibility for assistance and services. Such agreement shall require the public institution or medical institution providing services to such inmate to provide the Department of Community Health with the required monetary payment to match the federal matching funds as set forth in federal law for the services received.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-4/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted former paragraph (a)(3), which read: “Is not, at the time of receiving assistance, an inmate or patient of any public institution, except as a patient in a medical institution. An inmate or patient of such an institution may, however, make application for such assistance but the assistance, if granted, shall not begin until after he ceases to be an inmate;”; redesignated former paragraphs (a)(4) through (a)(6) as present paragraphs (a)(3) through (a)(5), respectively; substituted “attaining eligibility” for “rendering himself eligible” in present paragraph (a)(3); and substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “Final conviction of a crime or criminal offense and detention of one so convicted either by this state or by any subdivision thereof shall constitute a forfeiture or suspension of all rights to assistance under this article but only during the period of actual confinement.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

49-4-33.
Duties of department under this article.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of assistance under this article by the county departments;

Take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out this article;

Prescribe the form of and print and supply to the county departments such forms as it may deem necessary and advisable; and

Publish in print or electronically an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

49-4-34.
Duties of county departments under this article.

The county departments shall:

Administer this article in their respective counties, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the board pursuant to this article;

Report to the department at such times and in such manner and form as the department may from time to time direct; and

Submit to the county commissioner or board of commissioners or the legally constituted fiscal or financial agent of the county, after approval by the department, a budget containing an estimate and supporting data setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 5.

49-4-35.
Assistance is neither assignable nor subject to legal process or operation of bankruptcy law; payment of assistance check after death of recipient.

Assistance granted under this article shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity; and none of the money paid or payable under this article shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Where a recipient dies after authorization of his assistance grant but before negotiation of his assistance check for the month in which his death occurs, endorsement of such check without recourse by the department to the spouse or nearest living relative of the recipient shall be sufficient authorization to the drawee bank to pay such check.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 11; Ga. L. 1950, p. 316, § 1.

49-4-36.
Payment of assistance after recipient moves to another county.

Any recipient who moves to another county in this state shall be entitled, with the approval of the Department of Human Services, to receive assistance in the county to which he has moved; and the county department of the county from which he has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the county department of the county to which he has moved. The county from which the recipient has moved shall pay the assistance for a period of two months, after which time the county to which he has moved shall pay the assistance, if he remains otherwise eligible.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 16; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-4-37.
Claims to assistance subject to amendments or repeals.

All assistance granted under this article shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to any amending or repealing Act that may hereafter be passed; and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of his assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 19.

49-4-38.
Roll book of employees.

Each county board shall maintain for public information a roll book giving the name and address of and salary paid each employee of the county board in the county.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 19A.